Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-212 Person defined. Person
means any individual, company, insurer, association, organization, group,
reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges, partnership, business, trust, or
corporation. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next